Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6210
Applicability of act; when.

The Assumption Reinsurance Act shall apply to all assumption reinsurance agreements entered into on or after January 1, 1994.

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 71.